Oklahoma, session 2025, SB522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 321, O.S.L.


2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 427.29), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 427.29. A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma


Medical Marijuana Authority Executive Advisory Council.


B. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority Executive Advisory


Council shall consist of the following members, and all appointees


shall serve their terms at the pleasure of the appointing authority


and may be removed or replaced without cause:


1. One member appointed by the Governor to represent all


citizens of this state;

Req. No. 244 Page 1


2. One member appointed by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of


Representatives, who shall be a citizen from a county with a


population under twenty-five thousand (25,000) persons, as


determined by the latest Federal Decennial Census;


3. One member appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the


Oklahoma State Senate, who shall be a citizen from a municipality


with a population in excess of seventy-five thousand (75,000)


persons, as determined by the latest Federal Decennial Census;


4. One member appointed by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of


Representatives, who is a current medical marijuana business license


holder;


5. One member appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the


Oklahoma State Senate, who is a current medical marijuana business


license holder; and


6. One member appointed by the Governor, who holds a medical


marijuana patient license.


C. The Executive Director of the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana


Authority shall chair the Advisory Council and provide staff and


administrative support to the Advisory Council.


D. The Advisory Council shall select a co-chair from the


membership of the Advisory Council.


E. Each member of the Advisory Council shall serve a term of


four (4) years from the date of appointment. Members of the


Advisory Council shall not serve more than two consecutive terms.

Req. No. 244 Page 2


F. A majority of the members of the Advisory Council shall


constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and for taking


any official actions. Official actions by the Advisory Council


shall have a favorable vote by a majority of the members present.


G. Appointed members who serve on the Advisory Council shall be


exempt from dual-office-holding prohibitions pursuant to Section 6


of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


H. The Advisory Council may advise the Authority of recommended


changes to state policy, rules, or statutes.


I. The Advisory Council shall organize a task force to research


and provide recommendations on purchase and possession limits for


licensed medical marijuana patients. This task force shall consult


with various professionals and stakeholders including, but not


limited to, physicians, the State Board of Medical Licensure and


Supervision, the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, the Board of


Podiatric Medical Examiners, licensed medical marijuana patients,


veterans, and licensed medical marijuana business owners. The task


force may meet separately from the Advisory Council and as often as


necessary to conduct business. The task force shall submit a final


report of its findings and recommendations to the Authority by


November 1, 2026.


J. The Advisory Council shall prepare and issue a report of its


findings and recommendations electronically to the Governor,


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and Speaker of the House by

Req. No. 244 Page 3


November 1, 2025, and no later than November 1 of each year


thereafter.


J. K. Members appointed pursuant to subsection B of this


section shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for


expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance


with the State Travel Reimbursement Act.


K. L. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority Executive


Advisory Council shall meet as often as necessary to conduct


business but shall meet not less than four times a year, with an


organizational meeting to be held prior to January 1, 2025.


L. M. Any vacancy occurring on the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana


Authority Executive Advisory Council shall be filled for the


unexpired term of office in the same manner as provided for in


subsection B of this section.


M. N. The Advisory Council shall act in accordance with the


provisions of the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, the Oklahoma Open


Records Act, and the Administrative Procedures Act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-244 CAD 1/19/2025 5:37:59 AM









Req. No. 244 Page 4